nl: Oplaadniveau: Niveau 1 (120v); Niveau 2 (240v); Niveau 3 (480v+); Andere
nb: Ladenivå: Nivå 1 (120v); Nivå 2 (240v); Nivå 3 (480v+); Annet
ru: Уровень зарядной станции: Уровень 1 (120 В); Уровень 2 (240 В); Уровень 3 (480 В+); Другое
pt-BR: Nível de carregamento: Nível 1 (120v); Nível 2 (240 V); Nível 3 (480v+); Outro
en: Charging level: Level 1 (120v); Level 2 (240v); Level 3 (480v+); Other
hr-HR: Razina punjenja: Razina 1 (120 V); Razina 2 (240 V); Razina 3 (480 V i više); Ostalo
lt-LT: Įkrovimo lygis: 1 lygis (120 V); 2 lygis (240 V); 3 lygis (480 V+); Kita
fr: Niveau de chargement: Niveau 1 (120v); Niveau 2 (240v); Niveau 3 (480v+); Autre
hu: Töltési szint: 1. szintű (120 V); 2. szintű (240 V); 3. szintű (480 V +); Egyéb
ro-RO: Nivel de încărcare: Nivelul 1 (120 V); Nivelul 2 (240 V); Nivelul 3 (480 V+); Altele
th: ระดับการชาร์จ: ระดับ 1 (120V); ระดับ 2 (240V); ระดับ 3 (480V+); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Ниво на зареждане: Ниво 1 (120v); Ниво 2 (240 V); Ниво 3 (480v+); Други
sv: Laddningsnivå: Nivå 1 (120 V); Nivå 2 (240 V); Nivå 3 (480 V+); Övrigt
es: Nivel de carga: Nivel 1 (120v); Nivel 2 (240v); Nivel 3 (480v+); Otros
vi: Mức sạc: Cấp 1 (120v); Cấp 2 (240v); Cấp 3 (480v+); Khác
el: Επίπεδο φόρτισης: Επιπέδου 1 (120v); Επιπέδου 2 (240v); Επιπέδου 3 (480v+); Άλλο
de: Ladezustand: Stufe 1 (120 V); Stufe 2 (240 V); Stufe 3 (>480 V); Sonstiges
pl: Poziom naładowania: Poziom 1 (120 V); Poziom 2 (240 V); Poziom 3 (480 V+); Inne
it: Livello di carica: Livello 1 (120 V); Livello 2 (240 V); Livello 3 (480v+); Altro
zh-CN: 充电电量: 1 级 (120v); 2 级 (240v); 3 级 (480v); 其他
sl-SI: Stopnja polnjenja: 1. stopnja (120v); 2. stopnja (240v); 3. stopnja (480v+); Drugo
pt-PT: Nível de carregamento: Nível 1 (120 v); Nível 2 (240 v); Level 3 (+480 v); Outro
ko: 충전 수준: 레벨 1(120v); 레벨 2(240v); 레벨 3(480v+); 기타
fi: Lataustaso: Taso 1 (120v); Taso 2 (240 V); Taso 3 (480v+); Muu
zh-TW: 充電等級: 1 級 (120v); 2 級 (240v); 3 級 (480v+); 其他
tr: Şarj Seviyesi: Seviye 1 (120v); Seviye 2 (240v); Seviye 3 (480v+); Diğer
cs: Úroveň nabíjení: Úroveň 1 (120 V); Úroveň 2 (240 V); Úroveň 3 (480 V+); Jiné
da: Opladningsniveau: Niveau 1 (120v); Niveau 2 (240v); Niveau 3 (480v+); Andet
ja: 充電レベル: レベル1 (120v); レベル2 (240v); レベル3 (480v+); その他
sk-SK: Úroveň nabitia: Úroveň 1 (120 V); Úroveň 2 (240 V); Úroveň 3 (480 V+); Iné